Washington statutes.
RCW 26.04.210

Affidavits required for issuance of license—Penalties.

(1) The county auditor, before a marriage license is issued, upon the payment of a license fee as fixed in RCW 36.18.010 shall require each applicant therefor to make and file in the auditor's office upon blanks to be provided by the county for that purpose, an affidavit showing that if an applicant is afflicted with any contagious sexually transmitted disease, the condition is known to both applicants, and that the applicants are the age of 18 years or over. Such affidavit may be subscribed and sworn to before any person authorized to administer oaths.

(2) Anyone knowingly swearing falsely to any of the statements contained in the affidavits mentioned in this section is guilty of perjury under chapter 9A.72 RCW.

(3) The affidavit form shall be designed to require a statement that no contagious sexually transmitted disease is present or that the condition is known to both applicants, without requiring the applicants to state whether or not either or both of them are afflicted by such disease.

(4) Any person knowingly violating this section is guilty of a class C felony and shall be punished by a fine of not more than $1,000, or by imprisonment in a state correctional facility for a period of not more than three years, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

[ 2024 c 10 s 3; 2003 c 53 s 166; 1995 c 301 s 78; 1985 c 82 s 5; 1979 ex.s. c 128 s 2; 1973 1st ex.s. c 154 s 29; 1970 ex.s. c 17 s 5; 1963 c 230 s 4; 1959 c 149 s 3; 1909 ex.s. c 16 s 3; 1909 c 174 s 3; Code 1881 ss 2391, 2392; 1867 p 104 s 1; 1866 p 83 ss 13, 14; RRS s 8451.]

NOTES:

Application—2024 c 10: See note following RCW 26.04.010.

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.

Severability—1973 1st ex.s. c 154: See note following RCW 2.12.030.